Idaho, session 2026, H0498.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 4, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-465A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-465A. EMPLOYMENT OF PRIVATE COUNSEL IN ACTIONS AGAINST THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT. When, in the judgment of the president pro tempore of the senate
and the speaker of the house of representatives, the interest of the state
requires counsel in addition to the attorney general to pursue an action
against the federal government on behalf of the state, the president pro
tempore of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives may
jointly employ such counsel to pursue such actions.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect thirty days af-
ter its passage and approval.